src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON MUJTATJIT_TV  !!= @CODE@ Words ending -tjit, -jdit, reciprocals on -dit, momentatives on -dit, -edit, continuatives on -ldit, -nit, essives on -hit and 5-syllables - no actio cmps, but reintroduced. All -uvvat passives
                   +TV:%>        MUJTATJITStem             ;
                   +TV:          ODD-PASSIVE               ;
  +TV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%>  INFL-EVEN                 ; !Inchoative
  +TV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja    DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative
 +TV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá%> INFL-CONTRACTED           ; !Inchoative
 +TV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá   DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT     ; !Inchoative
       +IV+Cond:%>»alulu    V-ODD-PRET            ;

!!€gt-norm: nårddådit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ nårddådav:            nårddådit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ nårddådiv:            nårddådit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ nårddådijma:          nårddådit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON HÁLIJDIT_TV  !!= @CODE@ Words ending -IJDIT. Same as MUJTATJIT, but a common error is to write "hálidit", so the whole -ijdit and Err/Orth -idit is made in this  lexicon

         :ijd9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
+Err/Orth:id9  MUJTATJIT_TV ;

LEXICON BÅNJÅDIT_TV  !!= @CODE@ continuatives on -dit, frequentatives on -odit, reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio cpms. All -uvvat  passives.
                   +TV:%>        UNNEDITStem               ;
                   +TV:          ODD-PASSIVE               ;
  +TV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%>  INFL-EVEN                 ; !Inchoative
  +TV+Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja    DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative
 +TV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá%> INFL-CONTRACTED           ; !Inchoative
 +TV+Der1+Der/ahttjá+V:»ahttjá   DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT     ; !Inchoative
       +IV+Cond:%>»alulu    V-ODD-PRET            ;

!!€gt-norm: tsirggalit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ tsirggalav:            tsirggalit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ tsirggaliv:            tsirggalit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ tsirggalijma:          tsirggalit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON VUORDDELIT_TV !!= @CODE@ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit. All -uvvat passives
            +TV:%>          UNNEDITStem             ;
            +TV:            DeverbalVerbsVUORDDELIT ;
            +TV:            ODD-PASSIVE             ;
+IV+Cond:%>»alulu    V-ODD-PRET            ;

!!€gt-norm: tsåggålit # Odd-syllable test
!!€ tsåggålav:            tsåggålit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ tsåggåliv:            tsåggålit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ tsåggålijma:          tsåggålit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON JÅRGESTITStem
   JÅRGESTITINCH ;
! ODD-PASSIVE ; ! this must go for TV only.

LEXICON UNNEDITStem
   UNNEDITINCH ;
! ODD-PASSIVE ; ! this must go for TV only.

LEXICON OADDÁDITINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:isj»goahte%> INFL-EVEN             ; !causative
                                 INFL-ODD-OADDÁDIT     ;
                                 DeverbalNounsOADDÁDIT ;

LEXICON JÅRGESTITINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:isj»goahte%>  INFL-EVEN             ; !causative
                                 INFL-ODD              ;
                                 DeverbalNounsJÅLLÅRIT ;

LEXICON UNNEDITINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:isj»goahte%> INFL-EVEN            ; !causative
                                 INFL-ODD             ;
                                 DeverbalNounsUNNEDIT ;


LEXICON MUJTATJITStem
   MUJTATJITINCH ;
! ODD-PASSIVE ; ! this must go for TV only.

LEXICON BEGATJITStem
   BEGATJITINCH ;
! ODD-PASSIVE ; ! this must go for TV only.



LEXICON MUJTATJITINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:isj»goahte%> INFL-EVEN              ; !causative
                                 INFL-ODD               ;
                                 DeverbalNounsMUJTATJIT ;

LEXICON BEGATJITINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:isj»goahte%> INFL-EVEN             ; !causative
                                 INFL-ODD              ;
                                 DeverbalNounsBEGATJIT ;

!!
!!
!! ## Contracted stems
! ----------------
!!
!!

LEXICON SJIERRIT_IV !!= @CODE@ Impersonals
 +IV:   DeverbalVerbsSJIERRIT ;
 +IV:%> SJIERRITinfl          ;
 +IV:d  SG3PASS               ;


!!€gt-norm: boavddit # Contracted test
!!€ boavddi:           boavddit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ boavddij:          boavddit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3

LEXICON SJIERRITinfl
                       +Imprt+ConNeg:           ENDLEX ;
                          +Imprt+Sg3:jis        ENDLEX ;
                        +ImprtII+Sg3:jus        ENDLEX ;
!                            +VAbess:dak        K      ; !Inga is a littlebit unsure about the -dak ending, maybe itºs really an ending for odd-syll but is mixed up?
                          +Actio+Com:mijn       K      ;
                          +Actio+Ela:mis        K      ;
                          +Actio+Ess:min        K      ;
                          +Actio+Gen:ma         K      ;
                          +Actio+Nom:m          K      ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:»goahtá%>  K      ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:»gådi%>j   K      ;
               +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:»goahte%>t K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»mav       K      ;
  +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijna     K      ; !
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn      K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ela:»mis       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ess:»min       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma        K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ine:»min       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»m         K      ;
                                +Ger:dijn       K      ;
                         +Ind+ConNeg:           K      ;
                        +Ind+Prs+Sg3:           K      ;
                        +Ind+Prt+Sg3:j          K      ;
                                +Inf:t          K      ;
                         +Pot+ConNeg:tja        K      ;
                            +Pot+Sg3:sj         K      ;
                             +PrfPrc:m          K      ;
                                +Sup:tjit       K      ;
                             +VAbess:k          K      ;
                               +VGen:           K      ;
        +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»m         R      ;
!                            +VAbess:dak        VUOHTA ;
                             +VAbess:k          VUOHTA ;


LEXICON BASSUT_IV !!= @CODE@ Passives
  +IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%>           INFL-EVEN           ;
                   +IV:%>                  INFL-CONTRACTED     ;
                   +IV:                    DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
!   +IV+Der2+Der/NomAg:»jiddje@C.NeedNoun@ ACTORder            ;
         +IV+Actio+Nom:m                   K                   ;
         +IV+Actio+Gen:ma                  K                   ;
         +IV+Actio+Com:mijn                K                   ;
         +IV+Actio+Ess:min                 K                   ;
         +IV+Actio+Ela:mis                 K                   ;
              +IV+Cond:%>»lulu             V-ODD-PRET          ;
          @C.NeedNoun@                     BASSUT_IV_flagged   ;


LEXICON BASSUT_IV_flagged
   +IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:»m                OADDÁM              ;
    +IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss             MUS                 ;
    
!!€gt-norm: buvvut # Contracted test
!!€ buvvuv:           buvvut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ buvvujiv:          buvvut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ buvvujma:         buvvut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
