src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
almmadit+V:almmad9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
aneldit+V:aneld9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
aŋádit+V:aŋád9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
tjålkådit+V:tjålkåd BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
basselit+V:bassel VUORDDELIT_TV ;
belajdit+V:belajd9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
bidtjidit+V:bidtjid9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
bieggut+V:bieggu BASSUT_IV ;
biekkodit+V:biekkod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
bievllut+V:bievllu BASSUT_IV ;
bivdatjit+V:bivdatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
boalbbalit+V:boalbbal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
boavddit+V:boavddi SJIERRIT_IV ;
buktalit+V:buktal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
buvvut+V:buvºvu BASSUT_IV ;
bádatjit+V:bádatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
báddut+V:báddu BASSUT_IV ;
bájttut+V:bájttu BASSUT_IV ;
bárddelit+V:bárddel VUORDDELIT_TV ;
bárudit+V:bárud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
bådnjålit+V:bådnjål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
bånatjit+V:bånatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
bånkodit+V:bånkod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
bårggålit+V:bårggål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
båsskålit+V:båsskål BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
båŋkodit+V:båŋkod9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
bæjsstut+V:bæjsstu BASSUT_IV ;
bækkodit+V:bækkod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
dahpalit+V:dahpal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
dassalit+V:dassal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
diehtalit+V:diehtal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
diehttut+V:diehttu BASSUT_IV ;
dihpput+V:dihppu BASSUT_IV ;
doahpolit+V:doahpol VUORDDELIT_TV ;
doalvvolit+V:doalvvol VUORDDELIT_TV ;
duorudit+V:duorud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
dálvvut+V:dálvvu BASSUT_IV ;
dárbahit+V+Err/Orth:dárbaj9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
dåbdidit+V:dåbdid9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
dådjålit+V:dådjål BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
dåhkkålit+V:dåhkkål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
dåjddålit+V:dåjddål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
dæddalit+V:dæddal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
dæddut+V:dæddu BASSUT_IV ;
gahtjalit+V:gahtjal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
gajkedit+V:gajked9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
gajkkut+V:gajkku BASSUT_IV ;
gesatjit+V:gesatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
giessalit+V:giessal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
gihkadit+V:gihkad9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
gihtjedit+V:gihtjed9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
goajvvolit+V:goajvvol VUORDDELIT_TV ;
goalkodit+V:goalkod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
goarrolit+V:goarrol VUORDDELIT_TV ;
gullut+V:gulºlu BASSUT_IV ;
guoddalit+V:guoddal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
guoddádit+V:guoddád9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
guovladit+V:guovlad9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
guvkkalit+V:guvkkal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
gáddalit+V:gáddal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
gájmitjit+V:gájmitj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
gárggalit+V:gárggal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
gávnnut+V:gávnnu BASSUT_IV ;
gålkudit+V:gålkud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
gåppsut+V:gåppsu BASSUT_IV ;
gårdaldit+V:gårdald9 MUJTATJIT_TV ; ! Termwiki 2020
gæhttjalit+V:gæhttjal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
hajitjit+V:hajitj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
happsut+V:happsu BASSUT_IV ;
hivástahttalit+V:hivástahttal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
hálijdit+V:hál HÁLIJDIT_TV ;
hásstelit+V:hásstel VUORDDELIT_TV ;
håhtsodit+V:håhtsod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
håjggådit+V:håjggåd9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
hæjttalit+V:hæjttal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
hævvut+V:hævºvu BASSUT_IV ;
ijmmut+V:ijmmu BASSUT_IV ;
jahkutjit+V:jahkutj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
jieggŋut+V:jieggŋu BASSUT_IV ;
joavggut+V:joavggu BASSUT_IV ;
jårgudit+V:jårgud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
jæskádit+V:jæskád9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
loavggalit+V:loavggal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
luojkadit+V:luojkad9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
luotsitjit+V:luotsitj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
láhpput+V:láhppu BASSUT_IV ;
lájttalit+V:lájttal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
låhkålit+V:låhkål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
låŋudit+V:låŋud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
muohttut+V:muohttu BASSUT_IV ;
májstatjit+V:májstatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
målådit+V:målåd9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
nirkkalit+V:nirkkal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
niskudit+V:niskud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
njoaládit+V:njoalád9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
njuolggidit+V:njuolggid9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
njåtsådit+V:njåtsåd9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
nuollalit+V:nuollal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
nårddådit+V:nårddåd9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
oaddut+V:oaddu BASSUT_IV ;
ramkodit+V:ramkod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
roavvut+V:roavºvu BASSUT_IV ;
råhkålit+V:råhkål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
salggut+V:salggu BASSUT_IV ;
siebllut+V:siebllu BASSUT_IV ;
siekkedit+V:siekked9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
sjavnjatjit+V:sjavnjatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
sjierrit+V:sjierºri SJIERRIT_IV ;
sjuhttjut+V:sjuhttju BASSUT_IV ;
sjuvvalit+V:sjuvval VUORDDELIT_TV ;
skoavddit+V:skoavddi SJIERRIT_IV ;
skuobadit+V:skuobad9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
skávttjut+V:skávttju BASSUT_IV ;
slabttsit+V:slabttsi SJIERRIT_IV ;
slahttit+V:slahtti SJIERRIT_IV ;
soavllut+V:soavllu BASSUT_IV ;
spæhkkalit+V:spæhkkal BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
suodjalit+V:suodjal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
tjadnalit+V:tjadnal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
tjaskatjit+V:tjaskatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
tjiddnut+V:tjiddnu BASSUT_IV ;
tjissadit+V:tjissad9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
tjuoggolit+V:tjuoggol VUORDDELIT_TV ;
tjáhttjut+V:tjáhttju BASSUT_IV ;
tjálatjit+V:tjálatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
tjåhkkålit+V:tjåhkkål VUORDDELIT_TV ;
tsirgodit+V:tsirgod9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
tsábmatjit+V:tsábmatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
vattatjit+V:vattatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
vuoddjut+V:vuoddju BASSUT_IV ;
vuodjelit+V:vuodjel VUORDDELIT_TV ;
vuohtudit+V:vuohtud9 BÅNJÅDIT_TV ;
vuossjut+V:vuosºsju BASSUT_IV ;
vuotjatjit+V:vuotjatj MUJTATJIT_TV ;
várjjalit+V:várjjal VUORDDELIT_TV ;
árahit+V:árah9 MUJTATJIT_TV ;
